District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.04

Contracting authority.

The Mayor may contract with qualified carriers to provide health benefits under the laws of the District for periods of time to be determined by the Mayor. Any contract under this section shall be in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3 of Title 2.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2104
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(d), 34 DCR 5079

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-621.03 and § 1-621.12.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-622.4.